District of Columbia statutes.
2-1709

Disposition of public records at end of official’s term.

(a)

On or before the expiration of the term of office of an elected or appointed official, all public records, books, writings, and letters in the custody of the official shall be promptly transmitted or relinquished to the official’s successor or, if there is none, to the Administrator.

(b)

Any official who maliciously destroys, defaces, or removes any public record, as defined by this chapter, shall be subject to the penalties established in section 14.

Sept. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-19, § 10, 32 DCR 3590
1981 Ed., § 1-2909.
“Section 14”, referred to at the end of subsection (b), is § 14 of D.C. Law 6-19.